legacy-o/qce_rules
// Commune Elven spelling/transcription -> eSpeak phonemes
.group a
    aa      a:
    a       a
.group b
    b       b
.group d
    d       d
.group e
    ee      e:
    e       e
.group f
    f       f
.group g
    g       g
.group i
    ii      i:
    i       i
.group j
    j       j
.group l
    l       l
.group m
    m       m
.group n
    n       n
.group o
    oo      o:
    o       o
.group p
    p       p
.group r
    r       R
.group ɹ
    ɹ       r
.group s
    s       s
.group t
    t       t
.group u
    uu      u:
    u       u
